src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                      Lule Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


! ===========================
!! !!!Sublexica for Adjective
! ===========================

! Sone 2b: Adjektivsdeklinasjon
LEXICON a
 +A+Msc+Sg:%>  # ;
 +A+Neu+Sg:%>  # ;
 +A+Fem+Sg:%>ă # ;
 +A+Msc+Pl:%>i # ;
 +A+Fem+Pl:%>e # ;
 +A+Neu+Pl:%>e # ;
